California, session 20252026, AB284.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 12525.5 of the Government Code is amended to read:12525.5.(a)(1)Each state and local agency that employs peace officers shall annually report to the Attorney General data on all stops conducted by that agency’s peace officers for the preceding calendar year.(2)Each agency that employs 1,000 or more peace officers shall begin collecting data on or before July 1, 2018, and shall issue its first round of reports on or before April 1, 2019. Each agency that employs 667 or more but less than 1,000 peace officers shall begin collecting data on or before January 1, 2019, and shall issue its first round of reports on or before April 1, 2020. Each agency that employs 334 or more but less than 667 peace officers shall begin collecting data on or before January 1, 2021, and shall issue its first round of reports on or before April 1, 2022. Each agency that employs 1 or more but less than 334 peace officers shall begin collecting data on or before January 1, 2022, and shall issue its first round of reports on or before April 1, 2023.(b)The reporting shall include, at a minimum, the following information for each pedestrian, traffic, or any other type of stop:(1)The time, date, and location of the stop.(2)The reason for the stop.(3)The reason given to the person stopped at the time of the stop.(4)The result of the stop, such as, no action, warning, citation, property seizure, or arrest.(5)If a warning or citation was issued, the warning provided or violation cited.(6)If an arrest was made, the offense charged.(7)The perceived race or ethnicity, gender, and approximate age of the person stopped, provided that the identification of these characteristics shall be based on the observation and perception of the peace officer making the stop, and the information shall not be requested from the person stopped. For motor vehicle stops, this paragraph only applies to the driver, unless any actions specified under paragraph (8) apply in relation to a passenger, in which case the characteristics specified in this paragraph shall also be reported for that passenger.(8)Actions taken by the peace officer during the stop, including, but not limited to, the following:(A)Whether the peace officer asked for consent to search the person, and, if so, whether consent was provided.(B)Whether the peace officer searched the person or any property, and, if so, the basis for the search and the type of contraband or evidence discovered, if any.(C)Whether the peace officer seized any property and, if so, the type of property that was seized and the basis for seizing the property.(c)If more than one peace officer performs a stop, only one officer is required to collect and report to the officer’s agency the information specified under subdivision (b).(d)State and local law enforcement agencies shall not report the name, address, social security number, or other unique personal identifying information of persons stopped, searched, or subjected to a property seizure, for purposes of this section. Notwithstanding any other law, the data reported shall be available to the public, except for the badge number or other unique identifying information of the peace officer involved. Law enforcement agencies are solely responsible for ensuring that personally identifiable information of the individual stopped or any other information that is exempt from disclosure pursuant to this section is not transmitted to the Attorney General in an open text field.(e)Not later than January 1, 2018, the Attorney General, in consultation with stakeholders, including the Racial and Identity Profiling Advisory Board (RIPA) established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (j) of Section 13519.4 of the Penal Code, federal, state, and local law enforcement agencies and community, professional, academic, research, and civil and human rights organizations, shall issue regulations for the collection and reporting of data required under subdivision (b). The regulations shall specify all data to be reported, and provide standards, definitions, and technical specifications to ensure uniform reporting practices across all reporting agencies. To the best extent possible, the regulations should be compatible with any similar federal data collection or reporting program.(f)All data and reports made pursuant to this section are public records within the meaning of Section 7920.530 and are open to public inspection pursuant to Sections 7922.500 to 7922.545, inclusive, 7923.000, and 7923.005.(g)(1)For purposes of this section, “peace officer,” as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, is limited to members of the California Highway Patrol, a city or county law enforcement agency, and California state or university educational institutions. “Peace officer,” as used in this section, does not include probation officers and officers in a custodial setting.(2)(A)For purposes of this section, “stop” means any detention by a peace officer of a person, or any peace officer interaction with a person in which the peace officer conducts a search, including a consensual search, of the person’s body or property in the person’s possession or control.(B)A “stop” does not include any of the following:(i)A peace officer interaction with a person that results from a call for service.(ii)A situation in which a peace officer is required by state or local law to respond.(iii)A situation where a particular person is being sought by law enforcement.(iv)A detention is necessary to prevent serious bodily injury or death.(v)A detention in response to a suspected serious or violent felony.(vi)A situation in which a peace officer is directed by their employing agency to respond to a particular situation.(h)This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.SEC. 2.SECTION 1. Section 13519.4 of the Penal Code is amended to read:13519.4. (a) The commission shall develop and disseminate guidelines and training for all peace officers in California as described in subdivision (a) of Section 13510 and who adhere to the standards approved by the commission, on the racial and cultural differences among the residents of this state. The course or courses of instruction and the guidelines shall stress understanding and respect for racial, identity, and cultural differences, and development of effective, noncombative methods of carrying out law enforcement duties in a diverse racial, identity, and cultural environment.(b) The course of basic training for peace officers shall include adequate instruction on racial, identity, and cultural diversity in order to foster mutual respect and cooperation between law enforcement and members of all racial, identity, and cultural groups. In developing the training, the commission shall consult with appropriate groups and individuals having an interest and expertise in the field of racial, identity, and cultural awareness and diversity.(c) For the purposes of this section the following shall apply:(1) “Disability,” “gender,” “nationality,” “religion,” and “sexual orientation” have the same meaning meanings as in Section 422.55.(2) “Culturally diverse” and “cultural diversity” include, but are not limited to, disability, gender, nationality, religion, and sexual orientation issues.(3) “Racial” has the same meaning as “race or ethnicity” in Section 422.55.(4) “Stop” has the same meaning as in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 12525.5 of the Government Code.(d) The Legislature finds and declares as follows:(1) The working men and women in California law enforcement risk their lives every day. The people of California greatly appreciate the hard work and dedication of peace officers in protecting public safety. The good name of these officers should not be tarnished by the actions of those few who commit discriminatory practices.(2) Racial or identity profiling is a practice that presents a great danger to the fundamental principles of our Constitution and a democratic society. It is abhorrent and cannot be tolerated.(3) Racial or identity profiling alienates people from law enforcement, hinders community policing efforts, and causes law enforcement to lose credibility and trust among the people whom law enforcement is sworn to protect and serve.(4) Pedestrians, users of public transportation, and vehicular occupants who have been stopped, searched, interrogated, and subjected to a property seizure by a peace officer for no reason other than the color of their skin, national origin, religion, gender identity or expression, housing status, sexual orientation, or mental or physical disability are the victims of discriminatory practices.(5) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting the changes to this section made by the act that added this paragraph that additional training is required to address the pernicious practice of racial or identity profiling and that enactment of this section is in no way dispositive of the issue of how the state should deal with racial or identity profiling.(e) “Racial or identity profiling,” for purposes of this section, is the consideration of, or reliance on, to any degree, actual or perceived race, color, ethnicity, national origin, age, religion, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, or mental or physical disability in deciding which persons to subject to a stop or in deciding upon the scope or substance of law enforcement activities following a stop, except that an officer may consider or rely on characteristics listed in a specific suspect description. The activities include, but are not limited to, traffic or pedestrian stops, or actions during a stop, such as asking questions, frisks, consensual and nonconsensual searches of a person or any property, seizing any property, removing vehicle occupants during a traffic stop, issuing a citation, and making an arrest.(f) A peace officer shall not engage in racial or identity profiling.(g) Every peace officer in this state shall participate in expanded training as prescribed and certified by the Commission on Peace Officers Standards and Training.(h) The curriculum shall be evidence-based and shall include and examine evidence-based patterns, practices, and protocols that make up racial or identity profiling, including implicit bias. This training shall prescribe evidence-based patterns, practices, and protocols that prevent racial or identity profiling. In developing the training, the commission shall consult with the Racial and Identity Profiling Advisory Board established pursuant to subdivision (j). The course of instruction shall include, but not be limited to, significant consideration of each of the following subjects:(1) Identification of key indices and perspectives that make up racial, identity, and cultural differences among residents in a local community.(2) Negative impact of intentional and implicit biases, prejudices, and stereotyping on effective law enforcement, including examination of how historical perceptions of discriminatory enforcement practices have harmed police-community relations and contributed to injury, death, disparities in arrest detention and incarceration rights, and wrongful convictions.(3) The history and role of the civil and human rights movement and struggles and their impact on law enforcement.(4) Specific obligations of peace officers in preventing, reporting, and responding to discriminatory or biased practices by fellow peace officers.(5) Perspectives of diverse, local constituency groups and experts on particular racial, identity, and cultural and police-community relations issues in a local area.(6) The prohibition against racial or identity profiling in subdivision (f).(i) Once the initial basic training is completed, each peace officer in California as described in subdivision (a) of Section 13510 who adheres to the standards approved by the commission shall be required to complete a refresher course every five years thereafter, or on a more frequent basis if deemed necessary, in order to keep current with changing racial, identity, and cultural trends.(j) (1) Beginning July 1, 2016, the Attorney General shall establish the Racial and Identity Profiling Advisory Board (RIPA) for the purpose of eliminating racial and identity profiling, and improving diversity and racial and identity sensitivity in law enforcement.(2) RIPA shall include the following members:(A) The Attorney General, or their designee.(B) The President of the California Public Defenders Association, or their designee.(C) The President of the California Police Chiefs Association, or their designee.(D) The President of the California State Sheriffs’ Association, or their designee.(E) The President of the Peace Officers Research Association of California, or their designee.(F) The Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol, or their designee.(G) The President of the California District Attorneys Association, or their designee.(H)A member of the commission who is an active peace officer but is not otherwise already a member of RIPA. (I)(H) A university professor who specializes in policing, and racial and identity equity.(J)A representative(I) Two representatives of a human or civil rights tax-exempt organization who specializes specialize in civil or human rights.(K)A representative(J) Two representatives of a community organization who specializes specialize in civil or human rights and criminal justice, and works work with victims of racial and identity profiling. At least one representative shall be between 16 and 24 years of age.(L)A religious clergy member(K) Two religious clergy members who specializes specialize in addressing and reducing racial and identity bias toward individuals and groups.(L) Up to two other members that the Governor may prescribe.(M) Up to two other members that the President pro Tempore of the Senate may be prescribe.(N) Up to two other members that the Speaker of the Assembly may prescribe.(3) Each year, on an annual basis, RIPA shall do the following:(A) Analyze the data reported pursuant to Section 12525.5 of the Government Code and Section 13012 of this code.(B) Analyze law enforcement training under this section.(C) Work in partnership with state and local law enforcement agencies to review and analyze racial and identity profiling policies and practices across geographic areas in California.(D) Conduct, and consult available, evidence-based research on intentional and implicit biases, and law enforcement stop, search, and seizure tactics.(E) (i) Issue a report that provides RIPA’s analysis under subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, and detailed findings on the past and current status of racial and identity profiling, and makes policy recommendations for eliminating racial and identity profiling. RIPA shall post the report on its internet website. Each report shall include disaggregated statistical data for each reporting law enforcement agency. The report shall include, at minimum, each reporting law enforcement agency’s total results for each data collection criterion under subdivision (b) of Section 12525.5 of the Government Code for each calendar year. The report shall include an analysis of stops that involve persons stopped in geographic locations that are different from where the person lives, works, or attends an educational institution. The report may include a response to any dissenting opinion included in the report pursuant to clause (ii). The reports shall be retained and made available to the public by posting those reports on the Department of Justice’s OpenJustice web portal. The first annual report shall be issued no later than January 1, 2018. The reports are public records within the meaning of Section 7920.530 of the Government Code and are open to public inspection pursuant to Sections 7922.500 to 7922.545, inclusive, 7923.000, and 7923.005 of the Government Code.(ii)Before publication, the report shall be subject to peer review by two separate entities, at least one of which shall be selected collectively by the members of RIPA described in subparagraphs (C) through (F), inclusive, of paragraph (2). The peer review shall include independent analysis of RIPA data and not simply an analysis of the report.(iii)(ii) Notwithstanding paragraph (6), any member of RIPA may cause a dissenting opinion to be included in the report that includes conclusions or recommendations, or both, that are in addition to, or differ from, the report that is agreed to by a majority of the members.(F) Hold at least three public meetings annually to discuss racial and identity profiling, and potential reforms to prevent racial and identity profiling. Each year, one meeting shall be held in northern California, one in central California, and one in southern California. RIPA shall provide the public with notice of at least 60 days before each meeting.(4) Pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 12525.5 of the Government Code, RIPA shall advise the Attorney General in developing regulations for the collection and reporting of stop data, and ensuring uniform reporting practices across all reporting agencies.(5) Members of RIPA shall not receive compensation, nor per diem expenses, for their services as members of RIPA.(6) No action of RIPA shall be valid unless agreed to by a majority of its members.(7) The initial terms of RIPA members shall be four years.(8) Each year, RIPA shall elect two of its members as cochairpersons.SEC. 3.If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.